Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.120

Graduate work.

Whenever a course is authorized to be offered and taught by this code, in any of the institutions herein mentioned, as a major line, it shall carry with it the right to offer, and teach graduate work in such major lines.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.120. Prior: 1917 c 10 s 7; RRS s 4538. Formerly RCW 28.76.100.]